Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
480

MONOPOLIES;
RESTRAINT OF TRADE

Part I. Antitrust Provisions

Section

480-1 Definitions

480-2 Unfair competition, practices, declared
unlawful

480-3 Interpretation

480-3.1 Civil penalty

480-3.3 Endless chain schemes

480-4 Combinations in restraint of trade,
price-fixing and

limitation of production prohibited

480-5 Requirements and output contracts; tying
agreements

480-6 Refusal to deal

480-7 Mergers, acquisitions, holdings, and
divestitures

480-8 Interlocking directorates and
relationships

480-9 Monopolization

480-10 Exemption of labor organizations

480-11 Exemption of certain cooperative
organizations;

insurance transactions; approved mergers
of

federally regulated companies; homeless
facility

and program donors and provider agencies

480-12 Contracts void

480-13 Suits by persons injured; amount of
recovery,

injunctions

480-13.3 Class actions by private persons

480-13.5 Additional civil penalties for consumer
frauds

committed against elders

480-14 Suits by the State; amount of recovery

480-15 Injunction by attorney general or the
director of

the office of consumer protection

480-15.1 Penalty

480-16 Violation a felony

480-17 Individual liability for corporate or
company act

480-18 Investigation

480-19 Additional parties defendant

480-20 Duty of the attorney general; duty of
county

attorney, etc.

480-21 Court and venue

480-22 Judgment in favor of the State as evidence
in

Private action; suspension of limitation

480-23 Immunity from prosecution

480-23.1 Procedures

480-23.2 Use immunity

480-23.3 Transactional immunity

480-23.4 Penalty

480-24 Limitation of actions

Part II. Antitrust Exemption--Repealed

480-31 to 37 Repealed

Law Journals and Reviews

Timesharing in the 1990s. I HBJ No. 13, at pg. 89.

Seller Beware: New Law Protects Hawai‘i Home Buyers. 18 UH
L. Rev. 981.

Case Notes

In class action brought against major cigarette
manufacturers, tobacco trade associations, and the industry's public relations
firm, first amended complaint asserted violations of federal RICO statutes;
Hawaii's RICO statute, §842-2; federal antitrust statutes; Hawaii's antitrust
act (this chapter); various state common-law torts; and false advertising under
§708-871; defendants' motion to dismiss for failure to state a claim granted,
where injuries alleged by plaintiffs trust funds in first amended complaint
were not direct; even if remoteness doctrine did not bar claims, claims failed
for other reasons. 52 F. Supp. 2d 1196.

A municipality may be held liable under this chapter if its
act is done "in the conduct of any trade or commerce", but is not
subject to a treble damage penalty. 215 F. Supp. 2d 1098.

Plaintiff's investment was for business purposes where
plaintiff created plaintiff's own venture, plaintiff's investors were relying
on plaintiff to provide them with profit, and plaintiff acted as plaintiff's
own broker; plaintiff's investment under this chapter not a "personal
investment", and therefore plaintiff did not satisfy definition of
"consumer" pursuant to this chapter. 710 F. Supp. 2d 1036 (2010).

Section 657-20 is limited to causes of action mentioned in
part I of chapter 657 or §663-3, and therefore does not apply to plaintiff's
claim brought pursuant to this chapter. 777 F. Supp. 2d 1224 (2011).

Statute of limitations on a claim under this chapter may be
tolled under the equitable tolling doctrine of fraudulent concealment. 777 F.
Supp. 2d 1224 (2011).

Defendant lender's motion for summary judgment granted on
plaintiff borrower's unfair or deceptive acts or practices claim to the extent
that plaintiff based the claim against defendant on allegations that defendant
did not consider plaintiff's ability to repay the loans or whether plaintiff
qualified for a more favorable loan; plaintiff had not presented any evidence
that defendant actively participated in plaintiff's financial activity. 834 F.
Supp. 2d 1061 (2011).

Construing the evidence in plaintiff decedent's trustee's
favor, there was sufficient evidence (decedent mortgagee's impairments, e.g.,
advanced age, inability to see or hear, and dementia, rendered decedent
"incapable of reading, writing and understanding re-finance mortgage
documents") that the mortgage between decedent and defendants was void
under §480-12, such that plaintiff may continue to seek rescission under this
chapter. 848 F. Supp. 2d 1182 (2012).

Defendant mortgagee and loan servicer's motion to dismiss
plaintiff mortgagor's claim pursuant to §480-2 granted where plaintiff's
allegations appeared to sound at least partly in fraud, yet failed to meet
federal rule of civil procedure rule 9(b)'s particularity requirement; specifically,
where a chapter 480 claim is based on fraudulent acts, a plaintiff must plead
the claim with particularity. 850 F. Supp. 2d 1120 (2012).

Although a damage claim under §480-13 based on
violations of §480-2 may only be asserted against the wrongdoer, a rescission
claim under this chapter can stand against subsequent assignees if the contract
is void; where plaintiff had alleged that defendant mortgage broker assigned or
sold loans to other defendants, plaintiff could seek rescission against other
defendants if mortgage broker violated this chapter and the loans were void;
however, a plaintiff seeking affirmatively to void a mortgage transaction under
§480-12 must "place the parties in as close a position as they held prior
to the transaction". 861 F. Supp. 2d 1153 (2012).

With respect to plaintiff mortgagor's unfair and
deceptive acts or practices claim, to the extent plaintiff asserted that
defendant lender and loan servicer breached the Home Affordable Mortgage
Program guidelines, there was no express or implied private right of action to
sue lenders or loan servicers for violation of the Home Affordable Mortgage
Program. 863 F. Supp. 2d 1020 (2012).

District court concluded, for purposes of plaintiffs'
motion to remand to state court only, that: (1) some of plaintiffs'
allegations in counts II (violations of this chapter) and III (breach of
fiduciary duty) of the complaint were expressly preempted by ERISA pursuant to
29 U.S.C. §1144(a) and were not subject to the exception for the Hawaii Prepaid
Health Care Act, chapter 393; and (2) therefore, those claims were necessarily
federal in nature, and defendants' removal of the action based on federal
question jurisdiction was proper. 892 F. Supp. 2d 1288 (2012).

Where attorney general sought penalties of up to $10,000
for each violation of the unfair or deceptive acts or practices law (UDAP),
injunctive relief and additional penalties of up to $10,000 for each violation
of the UDAP committed against elders, the attorney general clearly invoked the
attorney general's civil enforcement authority under this chapter; proceedings
brought in that capacity are not class actions for purposes of the Class Action
Fairness Act. Attorney general's motions to remand lawsuits denied. 907 F.
Supp. 2d 1188 (2012).

Plaintiff's unfair and deceptive trade practices cause of
action under this chapter was statutory and was not in the nature of
assumpsit. 933 F. Supp. 2d 1264 (2013).

As §480-13(b) enumerates the specific damages that a consumer
may recover under this chapter and makes no provision for punitive damages,
plaintiffs were precluded from seeking punitive damages under this chapter. 98
H. 309, 47 P.3d 1222.

As this chapter was not designed as a vehicle for personal
injury actions, for which the law already provides adequate remedies,
plaintiffs could not recover damages for emotional distress under this
chapter. 98 H. 309, 47 P.3d 1222.

By the plain language of this chapter, no actual purchase is
necessary as a prerequisite to a consumer recovering damages under §480-13,
based on injuries stemming from violations of §480-2. 98 H. 309, 47 P.3d 1222.

Where trial court correctly concluded that there was no
contract between plaintiff and car dealership, plaintiff was neither entitled
to benefit-of-the-bargain damages nor specific performance, which are
preconditioned on the existence and breach of a contract. 98 H. 309, 47 P.3d
1222.

Where question of whether a waiver requirement would be
materially important in booking a horseback tour was a genuine issue of
material fact resolvable only by the trier of fact, trial court erred in
granting summary judgment on the unfair or deceptive trade practice claim under
this chapter. 111 H. 254, 141 P.3d 427.

Designation of the director to enforce chapter 443B does not
preclude standing to an individual to sue under this chapter, provided the
individual can satisfy the definition of "consumer". 78 H. 213
(App.), 891 P.2d 300.

Where vehicle theft registration system sold by car
dealership did not constitute "insurance"--as each system came with
an accompanying contract which unambiguously stated that if the system failed
to deter theft and the stolen vehicle was not recovered within thirty days, the
vehicle theft administration would pay the vehicle's registered owner an amount
of money toward the purchase of a replacement vehicle--car dealership did not
engage in an unfair and deceptive trade practice through the marketing and sale
of insurance. 122 H. 181 (App.), 223 P.3d 246 (2009).

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next